Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.175

Female genital mutilation—Minors—Civil action.

(1) A victim of female genital mutilation under RCW 9A.36.170 may bring a civil cause of action against the person who committed the female genital mutilation for economic and noneconomic damages, punitive damages, and reasonable attorneys' fees and costs incurred in bringing the action.

(2) A civil cause of action for female genital mutilation under this section must be commenced within 10 years of the acts alleged to have caused the injury. However, the time limit for commencement of an action under this section shall be tolled for a minor until the minor reaches the age of 18 years.

(3) For purposes of this section, "female genital mutilation" means any procedure performed for nonmedical reasons that involves partial or total removal of, or other injury to, the external female genitalia, including but not limited to a clitoridectomy or the partial or total removal of the clitoris or the prepuce or clitoral hood, excision or the partial or total removal (with or without excision of the clitoris) of the labia minora or the labia majora, or both, infibulation or the narrowing of the vaginal opening (with or without excision of the clitoris), or other procedures that are harmful to the external female genitalia, including pricking, incising, scraping, or cauterizing the genital area.

[ 2023 c 122 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2023 c 122: See notes following RCW 9A.36.170.